Indiana, session 2026, SB56.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 25-38.1-3-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.112-2014,
SECTION 37, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. The board may issue a license without an
examination to a qualified applicant who:
(1) furnishes satisfactory proof that the applicant:
(A) is a graduate of an accredited college of veterinary
medicine;
(B) holds an Educational Commission for Foreign Veterinary
Graduates (ECFVG) certificate; or
(C) holds a PAVE certificate;
(2) for the five (5) years immediately preceding filing an
application has been a practicing veterinarian licensed in a state,
territory, or district of the United States that has license
requirements substantially equivalent to the requirements of this
chapter; and
(1) satisfies the requirements set forth in IC 25-1-21; and
(3) (2) otherwise meets the requirements of this chapter.
SECTION 2. IC 25-38.1-3-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.58-2008,
SECTION 33, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. The board may issue a registration without an
examination to a qualified applicant who:
SEA 56

2
(1) furnishes satisfactory proof that the applicant has successfully
completed an accredited veterinary technology program;
(2) for the five (5) years immediately preceding filing an
application has been acting as a registered veterinary technician
in a state, territory, or district of the United States that has
registration requirements substantially equivalent to the
requirements of this chapter; and
(1) satisfies the requirements set forth in IC 25-1-21; and
(3) (2) otherwise meets the requirements of this chapter.
SEA 56

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 56